Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202660-137
Act; applicability.

(1) The Motor Vehicle Certificate of Title Act applies to all vehicles as defined in the act, except:

(a) Farm trailers;

(b) Fertilizer trailers;

(c) Well-boring apparatus, backhoes, bulldozers, and front-end loaders; and

(d) Trucks and buses from other jurisdictions required to pay registration fees under the Motor Vehicle Registration Act, except a vehicle registered or eligible to be registered as part of a fleet of apportionable vehicles under section 60-3,198.

(2)(a) All new all-terrain vehicles and minibikes sold on or after January 1, 2004, shall be required to have a certificate of title. An owner of an all-terrain vehicle or minibike sold prior to such date may apply for a certificate of title for such all-terrain vehicle or minibike as provided in rules and regulations of the department.

(b) All new low-speed vehicles sold on or after January 1, 2012, shall be required to have a certificate of title. An owner of a low-speed vehicle sold prior to such date may apply for a certificate of title for such low-speed vehicle as provided in rules and regulations of the department.

(3) An owner of any of the following may apply for a certificate of title upon compliance with the Motor Vehicle Certificate of Title Act:

(a) Any utility trailer;

(b) Beginning January 1, 2026, any self-propelled equipment designed and used exclusively to carry and apply fertilizer, chemicals, or related products to agricultural soil and crops, agricultural floater-spreader implements, and other implements of husbandry designed for and used primarily for tilling the soil and harvesting crops or feeding livestock; or

(c) Beginning January 1, 2026, any power unit hay grinders or a combination that includes a power unit and a hay grinder when operated without cargo.

(4)(a) Every owner of a manufactured home or mobile home shall obtain a certificate of title for the manufactured home or mobile home prior to affixing it to real estate.

(b) If a manufactured home or mobile home has been affixed to real estate and a certificate of title was not issued before it was so affixed, the owner of such manufactured home or mobile home shall apply for and be issued a certificate of title at any time for surrender and cancellation as provided in section 60-169.

(5) All new utility-type vehicles sold on or after January 1, 2011, shall be required to have a certificate of title. An owner of a utility-type vehicle sold prior to such date may apply for a certificate of title for such utility-type vehicle as provided in rules and regulations of the department.

Laws 2005, LB 276, § 37;

Laws 2006, LB 765, § 2;

Laws 2007, LB286, § 9;

Laws 2008, LB953, § 2;

Laws 2010, LB650, § 9;

Laws 2011, LB289, § 9;

Laws 2025, LB97, § 11;

Laws 2025, LB490, § 2.

Motor Vehicle Registration Act, see section 60-301.

There is no legal requirement that a lien be noted on a certificate of title purportedly covering property not subject to the Certificate of Title Act, even though a certificate of title for such property has been issued. Cushman Sales & Service of Nebraska, Inc. v. Muirhead, 201 Neb. 495, 268 N.W.2d 440 (1978).

Under the Nebraska Certificate of Title Act, a certificate of title is the exclusive method provided by statute for the transfer of title to an automobile, but it is not conclusive of ownership. First Nat. Bank & Trust Co. v. Ohio Cas. Ins. Co., 196 Neb. 595, 244 N.W.2d 209 (1976).

Certificate of Title Act applies to all motor vehicles required to be licensed with specified exceptions. Bank of Keystone v. Kayton, 155 Neb. 79, 50 N.W.2d 511 (1951).